Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.02.025

Referendum.

Upon the filing of a referendum petition in the manner provided in RCW 35A.29.170 signed by qualified electors in number equal to not less than ten percent of the votes cast in the last general municipal election, such resolution as authorized by RCW 35A.02.020 shall be referred to the voters for confirmation or rejection in the next general municipal election if one is to be held within one hundred and eighty days from the date of filing of the referendum petition, or at a special election to be called for that purpose in accordance with RCW 29A.04.330.

[ 2015 c 53 s 47; 1979 ex.s. c 18 s 4; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.02.025.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 18: See note following RCW 35A.01.070.